Washington statutes.
RCW 36.100.150

Costs of defense.

Whenever an action, claim, or proceeding is instituted against a person who is or was an officer or employee of the public facilities district arising out of the performance of duties for or employment with the district, the public facilities district may grant a request by the person that the attorney of the district's choosing be authorized to defend the claim, suit, or proceeding, and the costs of defense, attorneys' fees, and obligation for payments arising from the action may be paid from the district's funds. Costs of defense or judgment or settlement against the person shall not be paid in a case where the court has found that the person was not acting in good faith or within the scope of employment with or duties for the public facilities district.

[ 1995 c 396 s 12.]

NOTES:

Severability—1995 c 396: See note following RCW 36.100.010.